Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,152
Training program; fees.

The training program as set out in section 81-5,151 for volunteer fire departments and career fire departments shall be free, except that the State Fire Marshal may charge for such books and materials given to the students, testing, or specialized courses.

The State Fire Marshal may charge a fee for providing to private fire departments training, books, materials, testing, or specialized courses.

The State Fire Marshal shall charge a fee for providing to industrial fire brigades training, books, materials, testing, and specialized courses.

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 87.